New York, session 2025-2026, S2371.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. This act shall be known and may be cited as the "red tape 2 reduction act". 3 § 2. Section 202 of the state administrative procedure act is amended 4 by adding a new subdivision 1-a to read as follows: 5 1-a. Business burden offset. (a) If a rule is adopted that imposes a 6 new administrative burden on a business, one or more existing rules must 7 be amended or repealed to offset the cost of such new administrative 8 burden against the cost of an existing administrative burden on a busi- 9 ness. 10 (b) Every notice of proposed rulemaking, except those submitted solely 11 for the purpose of proposing a consensus rule, shall, if the proposed 12 rule would impose a new administrative burden on a business, include the 13 existing rule or rules to be amended or repealed to offset the cost of 14 such new administrative burden. 15 (c) The amendment or repeal of a rule under this subdivision shall not 16 compromise or endanger the public health, safety or economy of the state 17 or its citizens. 18 § 3. This act shall take effect immediately and shall apply to notices 19 of proposed rulemaking submitted on or after such date. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD05899-01-5